District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.08

Repealed

Confirmed order.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 608, 42 DCR 6748
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-346.8.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 608 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).